Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Chapter 7

Admissibility of Evidence

24-7-101. Child's out-of-court, non-testimonial statement.

An out-of-court, non-testimonial statement made by a child who is under twelve (12) years of age at the time of a criminal trial describing any sexual act performed by, with, or on the child or describing any act of physical violence directed against the child shall not be excluded from evidence at the criminal trial as hearsay if all of the following apply:

The court finds that the totality of the circumstances surrounding the making of the statement provides particularized guarantees of trustworthiness that make the statement at least as reliable as statements admitted pursuant to Rules 803 and 804 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence. The circumstances shall establish that the child was particularly likely to be telling the truth when the statement was made and that the test of cross-examination would add little to the reliability of the statement. In making a determination of the reliability of the statement, the court shall consider all of the circumstances surrounding the making of the statement, including, but not limited to, the spontaneity, internal consistency of the statement, mental state of the child, child's motive or lack of motive to fabricate, child's use of terminology unexpected of a child of similar age, means by which the statement was elicited, and lapse of time between the act and the statement. In making this determination, the court shall not consider whether independent proof exists of the sexual act or act of physical violence;

The child's testimony is not reasonably obtainable by the proponent of the statement;

Independent proof exists of the sexual act or act of physical violence; and

At least ten (10) days before the trial or hearing, a proponent of the statement has notified all other parties in writing of the content of the statement, the time and place at which the statement was made, the identity of the witness who is to testify about the statement, and the circumstances surrounding the statement that are claimed to indicate trustworthiness of the statement.

The child's testimony is not reasonably obtainable by the proponent of the statement under subdivision (a)(2) only if:

The child refuses to testify concerning the subject matter of the statement or claims a lack of memory of the subject matter of the statement after a person trusted by the child, in the presence of the court, urges the child to both describe the acts described by the statement and to testify;

The court finds that:

The child is absent from the trial or hearing;

The proponent of the statement has been unable to procure the child's attendance or testimony by process or other reasonable means despite a good faith effort to do so; and

It is probable that the proponent would be unable to procure the child's testimony or attendance if the trial or hearing were delayed for a reasonable time; or

The court finds that:

The child is unable to testify at the trial or hearing because of death or then-existing physical or mental illness or infirmity; and

The illness or infirmity would not improve sufficiently to permit the child to testify if the trial or hearing were delayed for a reasonable time.

The proponent of the statement fails to establish that the child's testimony or attendance is not reasonably obtainable under subdivision (a)(2) if the child's refusal, claim of lack of memory, inability, or absence is due to the procurement or wrongdoing of the proponent of the statement for the purpose of preventing the child from attending or testifying.

The court shall make the findings required by this section on the basis of a hearing conducted outside the presence of the jury and shall make findings of fact on the record, as to the bases for the court's ruling.

Nothing in this section shall affect the admissibility of evidence admitted under § 24-7-117 or § 24-7-120.

Acts 2018, ch. 708, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 708, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2018.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 708, § 2. July 1, 2018.

24-7-102. Use of statement of party given in student disciplinary proceeding concerning sexual misconduct — No right of party to be represented at public expense — Adoption of rules of evidence.

A written or oral statement of a party given in a student disciplinary proceeding concerning sexual misconduct must not be admissible in any civil or criminal trial, hearing, or proceeding for any purpose or be used for impeachment without the informed and written consent of the party if the statement was made in a student disciplinary proceeding in which the party did not have the active assistance of counsel.

This section does not create a right for a party to be represented at the expense of the public, including a public institution of higher education.

This section does not require a public institution of higher education to adopt formal rules of evidence in student disciplinary proceedings that are not a contested case under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

As used in this section:

“Active assistance of counsel” means the right to be represented by a licensed attorney who is allowed to fully participate in the student disciplinary proceeding or an appeal of a result of a student disciplinary proceeding;

“Civil or criminal trial, hearing, or proceeding” does not include any type of civil action, counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party complaint initiated by or against a public institution of higher education;

“Fully participate” means being allowed to engage in the following conduct in a student disciplinary proceeding on behalf of a party:

Make arguments to the hearing officer, including opening and closing arguments during a hearing and arguments on procedural and evidentiary issues; and

Examine and cross-examine witnesses, directly or indirectly, if live witness testimony is presented;

“Hearing officer” means:

A hearing officer, hearing panel, or hearing board in a student disciplinary proceeding other than a contested case conducted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act; or

An administrative law judge or hearing officer under the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act;

“Party” means:

A student accused of sexual misconduct; or

A victim of sexual misconduct;

“Sexual misconduct” means a violation of a public higher education institution's disciplinary policies concerning sexual assault, dating violence, domestic violence, or stalking; and

“Student disciplinary proceeding” means a hearing, proceeding, or any other non-law enforcement process, other than an investigation, that is used by a public higher education institution to determine whether sexual misconduct occurred or to impose a sanction with respect to sexual misconduct.

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Student Due Process Protection Act.”

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 14 provided that public institutions of higher education may implement this part by promulgating emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Title 4, Chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 15 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all contested cases that are requested on or after July 1, 2018.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

24-7-103 — 24-7-105. [Reserved.]

All receipts, releases, and discharges in writing, whether of a debt of record or a contract under seal, or otherwise, shall have effect according to the intention of the parties thereto. However, the remittance and acceptance of a check or other instrument bearing on its face words that it is payment or satisfaction in full of a debt or obligation shall not be considered conclusive evidence of an intention that the debt or obligation for which the same is given be discharged or released; provided, that the remittee of such instrument tenders back to the remittor the funds represented by such instrument.

Code 1858, § 3789; Shan., § 5570; Code 1932, § 9741; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-706; Acts 1983, ch. 456, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-8.03-1.1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Release, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Accord and Satisfaction — Release — Check Tendered in Full Payment of Liquidated Debt and Subsequently Endorsed Under Protest by Creditor Operates as a Written Release, 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 425.

Contracts (Merton Ferson), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1040.

Contracts — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Paul J. Hartman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1013.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Torts — Effect of Release of One of Several Persons Liable for Same Injury, 5 Tenn. L. Rev. 254.

24-7-107. Settlements of debts.

All settlements in writing, made in good faith, for the composition of debts, shall be taken as evidence, and held to operate according to the intention of the parties, although no release under seal is given, and no new consideration has passed.

Code 1858, § 3790; Shan., § 5571; Code 1932, § 9742; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-707.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Compromise and Settlement, § 9; 21 Tenn. Juris., Release, §§ 4, 5, 8.

Law Reviews.

Accord and Satisfaction — Release — Check Tendered in Full Payment of Liquidated Debt and Subsequently Endorsed Under Protest by Creditor Operates as a Written Release, 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 425.

24-7-108 — 24-7-111. [Reserved.]

In any contested paternity case, unless the individual is found to have good cause under § 654(29) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 654(29)), the court, or the department of human services in Title IV-D child support cases, shall order the parties and the child to submit to genetic tests to determine the child's parentage upon the request of any party if the request is supported by an affidavit of the party making the request:

and such affidavit: Alleges paternity, and sets forth facts establishing a reasonable possibility of the requisite sexual contact between the parties; or

Denies paternity, and sets forth facts establishing a reasonable possibility of the nonexistence of sexual contact between the parties;

and such affidavit: Denies paternity.

In addition, upon the court's own motion, at such times as it deems equitable, or by administrative order by the department of human services in Title IV-D child support cases, tests and comparisons pursuant to this section shall be ordered; or

In any case, except terminations of parental rights or adoptions under title 36 or title 37, in which the paternity of a child is at issue and the question of parentage arises, and an agreed order or divorce decree has been entered finding that an individual is not the parent of the child, the finding shall not be entitled to preclusive effect unless the finding was based upon scientific tests to determine parentage which excluded the individual from parentage of the child in question.

During any other civil or criminal proceeding in which the question of parentage arises, upon the motion of either party or on the court's own motion, the court shall at such time as it deems equitable order all necessary parties to submit to any tests and comparisons which have been developed and adapted for purposes of establishing or disproving parentage.

In any civil or criminal proceedings pursuant to this section, the tests ordered shall be conducted by an accredited laboratory. In the case of genetic tests, and at such time as the secretary of health and human services designates accreditation entities which acknowledge the reliability of types of genetic tests used in the establishment of paternity, such genetic tests shall be of the type which are generally acknowledged as reliable by accreditation entities designated by the secretary, and the genetic tests shall be performed by a laboratory approved by such a designated accreditation entity.

The results of such tests and comparisons which are ordered pursuant to this section, including the statistical likelihood of the alleged parent's parentage, if available, may be admitted into evidence as provided in subsection (b).

Upon receiving the results of the tests and comparisons conducted pursuant to subsection (a), the court shall proceed as follows:

Either party may request an additional parentage test upon the advanced payment of the costs of the additional parentage test. If the additional tests are requested by the department of human services, its contractors or any state agency, the costs of such additional tests shall be paid for upon being billed for such by the testing agent and may be recovered by those entities in any parentage proceeding from the person established as parent of the child;

If the results of the first test exclude paternity and the second test also exclude paternity, or, if the initial test results are negative on the issue of paternity establishment and no second test is requested, this shall be conclusive evidence of nonpaternity and the action shall be dismissed;

If the results of the first test establish paternity and the second test again establishes a positive statistical probability of parentage as described in subdivision (b)(2)(B) or (C), the positive test results with the greater positive probability of parentage shall be definitive for purposes of the application of the appropriate evidentiary standards relative to the presumptions and the defenses available in subdivision (b)(2);

If the results of the second test are different from the first test in their outcome relative to the exclusion or establishment of paternity, the court, or the department in appropriate cases, may order a third test, or the court may make a determination between the accuracy of the previous two (2) tests for purposes of determining paternity;

The results of any tests which may exclude a person as the father shall not preclude the initiation of a new paternity action involving another putative father or by a putative father against a mother to establish his paternity;

In any proceeding where the paternity of an individual is at issue, the written report of blood, genetic, or DNA test results by the testing agent concerning the paternity is admissible without the need for any foundation testimony or other proof of the authenticity or accuracy of the test unless a written objection is filed with the court and served upon all parties thirty (30) days prior to the date of the hearing. For purposes of this section, service shall be deemed made upon the date of mailing;

A rebuttable presumption of the paternity of an individual is established by blood, genetic, or DNA testing showing a statistical probability of paternity of that individual at ninety-five percent (95%) or greater. In such event, the case shall be tried before the court without a jury regarding the issue of paternity without the evidentiary limitations of subdivision (b)(2)(C);

When the results of blood, genetic or DNA tests show a statistical probability that a man is the father of the child in question by a statistical probability of ninety-nine percent (99%) or greater, the putative father may only attempt to rebut his paternity of the child by filing a motion with the tribunal and establishing upon clear and convincing evidence one (1) or more of only the following circumstances:

The putative father had undergone a medical sterilization procedure prior to the probable period of conception, or other medical evidence demonstrates that he was medically incapable of conceiving a child during the probable period of conception;

That the putative father had no access to the child's mother during the probable period of conception;

That the putative father has, or had, an identical twin who had sexual relations with the child's mother during the probable period of conception; or

The putative father presents evidence in the form of an affidavit that another man has engaged in sexual relations with the mother of the child in question during the period of probable conception. In this case, the court shall order genetic testing of that other man in conformity with this section. The results of that genetic test must indicate that the other man has a statistical probability of paternity of ninety-five (95%) or greater to establish an effective defense pursuant to this subdivision.

If, after test results showing a statistical probability of ninety-nine percent (99%) or greater, the putative father is able to show by clear and convincing evidence to the court that one (1) of the enumerated defenses in subdivision (b)(2)(C) is present, the matter shall be set for trial before the court without a jury;

If the putative father does not raise one (1) of the enumerated defenses in subdivision (b)(2)(C) or does not establish by clear and convincing evidence that one (1) of the enumerated defenses in subdivision (b)(2)(C) is present after test results showing a statistical probability of paternity of ninety-nine percent (99%) or greater, the court shall, upon motion by the other party, establish that individual as the father of the child in question, and shall order child support as required by title 36, chapter 5;

An affidavit documenting the chain of custody of any specimen used in any test pursuant to this section is admissible to establish the chain of custody;

All costs relative to the tests and comparisons under this section shall be paid initially by the party requesting such tests with the final allocation of costs awaiting the outcome of the proceedings, at which time the court shall determine the proper allocation of costs. Costs for initial tests requested by the department of human services or its contractors or any other state agency shall be paid by those entities with the costs to be recovered in any parentage proceeding from the person established as parent of the child.

Acts 1957, ch. 30, § 1; T.C.A., § 24-716; Acts 1983, ch. 459, § 1; 1991, ch. 268, § 1; 1994, ch. 988, §§ 2-4; 1997, ch. 551, §§ 43, 44; 2000, ch. 922, § 1.

Cross-References. Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity, §24-7-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bastardy, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Constitutionality of Statutes of Limitations in Paternity Actions, 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 263 (1983).

Domestic Relations — 1963 Tennessee Survey (T. A. Smedley), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1039.

Evidence — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Lyman R. Patterson), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1058.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

The Cradle Will Rock: Intentional Misrepresentation of Paternity, 49 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Conflict of interest of volunteers in district attorney general's office, OAG 99-085, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (4/6/99).

If DNA testing for paternal identification were required before child support is ordered by a court, such a requirement would not violate the Tennessee or the United States Constitutions, OAG 06-131, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 156 (8/15/06).

24-7-113. Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity.

A voluntary acknowledgment of paternity which is completed under § 68-3-203(g), § 68-3-302, or § 68-3-305(b) or under similar provisions of another state or government shall constitute a legal finding of paternity on the individual named as the father of the child in the acknowledgment, subject to rescission as provided in subsection (c). The acknowledgment, unless rescinded pursuant to subsection (c), shall be conclusive of that father's paternity without further order of the court.

A voluntary acknowledgment of paternity which is completed under § 68-3-203(g), § 68-3-302, or § 68-3-305(b), or under similar provisions of another state or government, when certified by the state registrar or other governmental entity maintaining the record of the acknowledgment, or the copy of the voluntary acknowledgment completed pursuant to § 68-3-302(d), shall be a basis for establishing a support order without requiring any further proceedings to establish paternity.

An acknowledgment of paternity executed as described in subdivision (b)(1) shall be entitled to full faith and credit in any judicial or administrative proceeding in this state.

No judicial or administrative proceedings are required, nor shall any such proceedings be permitted, to ratify an unchallenged acknowledgment of paternity in order to create the conclusive status of the acknowledgment of paternity.

A signatory to a voluntary acknowledgment shall be permitted to rescind the voluntary acknowledgment at the earlier of:

The completion and submission of a sworn statement refuting the named father on a form provided by the state registrar. This form must be filed in the office of vital records of the department of health, together with the fee required by the registrar within sixty (60) days of the date of completion of the acknowledgment; or

Within the sixty-day period following completion of the acknowledgment, at any judicial or administrative proceeding during that period at which the signatory is a party and which proceeding relates to the child, by completion of the form described in subdivision (c)(1)(A) or by the entry of an order by the administrative or judicial tribunal which directs the rescission of such acknowledgment.

The registrar may impose a fee for the filing of the rescission of voluntary acknowledgment in subdivision (c)(1)(A) and the registrar shall send a copy of the rescinded acknowledgment to the other signatory of the original acknowledgment. If an individual seeking to rescind an acknowledgment completes an affidavit of indigency which accompanies the rescission form, the fee shall be waived. Any fee for filing a rescission of a voluntary acknowledgment based upon fraud shall be assessed by the court against the person found to be the perpetrator of the fraud.

If, at any time during the hearing described in subdivision (c)(1)(B), the court, the referee, or the hearing officer has reasonable cause to believe that a signatory of the acknowledgment is or was unable to understand the effects of executing such acknowledgment, the court, the referee or hearing officer shall explain orally to the individual the effects of the execution of the acknowledgment, and the right to rescind the voluntary acknowledgment pursuant to subsection (c), and the right to parentage tests to determine paternity pursuant to § 24-7-112 in any proceeding relative to the issue of paternity of the child.

If the voluntary acknowledgment has not been rescinded pursuant to subsection (c), the acknowledgment may only be challenged on the basis of fraud, whether extrinsic or intrinsic, duress, or material mistake of fact.

The challenger must institute the proceeding upon notice to the other signatory and other necessary parties including the Title IV-D agency within five (5) years of the execution of the acknowledgment, and if the court finds based upon the evidence presented at the hearing that there is substantial likelihood that fraud, duress, or a material mistake of fact existed in the execution of the acknowledgment of paternity, then, and only then, the court shall order parentage tests. Such action shall not be barred by the five-year statute of limitations where fraud in the procurement of the acknowledgment by the mother of the child is alleged and where the requested relief will not affect the interests of the child, the state, or any Title IV-D agency. Nothing herein shall preclude the challenger from presenting any other form of evidence as a substitute for the parentage tests if it is not possible to conduct such tests.

The test results certified under oath by an authorized representative of an accredited laboratory shall be filed with the court and shall be admissible on the issue of paternity pursuant to § 24-7-112(b). If the acknowledged father is found to be excluded by the tests, an action seeking support shall be dismissed or the acknowledgment of paternity shall be rescinded, as appropriate. If the test results show a statistical probability of ninety-five percent (95%) or greater, a rebuttable presumption of paternity shall be established and the issue of paternity shall be tried before the court without a jury. If the test results show a probability of paternity of ninety-nine percent (99%) or greater, the acknowledgment of paternity will become conclusive and no further action shall be necessary to establish paternity unless a motion asserting the defenses of § 24-7-112(b)(2)(C) is successfully brought.

The burden of proof in any such proceeding shall be upon the challenger.

During the pendency of the hearing under this subsection (e) and any appeal from such hearing, the legal responsibilities of the signatory, including any child support obligations, may not be suspended, except for good cause shown.

The state of Tennessee, its officers, employees, agents or contractors, or any Title IV-D child support enforcement agency shall not be liable in any case to compensate any person for repayment of child support paid or for any other costs as a result of the rescission of any voluntary acknowledgment or the rescission of any orders of legitimation, paternity, or support entered under this section.

The rescission of an acknowledgment of paternity or entry of any order rescinding any acknowledgment of paternity pursuant to subsection (c) shall not preclude the initiation of a paternity action against the signatory who is the alleged putative father, or by a putative father against a mother to establish his paternity, nor shall it preclude the initiation of a paternity action against another putative father.

If, however, the voluntary acknowledgment is rescinded by order of the court based upon tests conducted pursuant to subsection (e) which excluded a person as parent, no further action may be initiated against such excluded person.

The original of the form rescinding the voluntary acknowledgment of paternity or a certified copy of any order rescinding a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity or a prior order of legitimation or paternity shall be sent by the person rescinding it or, as the case may be, by the clerk to the state registrar at the office of vital records of the department of health.

Upon receipt of the form rescinding the acknowledgment which was executed and filed with the registrar within the sixty-day period or upon receipt of the order which shows on its face that the voluntary acknowledgment has been rescinded at the hearing which is held no later than the sixtieth day following the completion of the voluntary acknowledgment, or upon receipt of a certified court order with a finding shown clearly in the court order that the voluntary acknowledgment of paternity was rescinded due to fraud, either intrinsic or extrinsic, duress or material mistake of fact, the registrar shall make the appropriate amendments to the birth certificate of the child who was the subject of the order.

Acts 1994, ch. 988, § 1; 1997, ch. 551, § 35; 1998, ch. 1098, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §24-7-118.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-7-113, concerning inadmissibility of testimony before committee of the general assembly, was transferred to §24-7-114 in 2000.

Cross-References. Admissibility in evidence of DNA analysis, §24-7-112.

Child support, title 36, ch. 5.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

24-7-114. Testimony before committee of general assembly inadmissible.

Without the consent of such witness there shall not be admitted into evidence in any civil proceeding in the courts of this state the testimony of a witness given before any committee of the general assembly of the state; provided such testimony when given was pertinent to the inquiry of such committee or responsive to a question from such committee.

Acts 1959, ch. 27, § 1; T.C.A., § 24-717; T.C.A §24-7-113.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-2-114, concerning opinions as to medical findings, was transferred to §24-7-115 in 2000.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rules 501 and 803 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-45.01-1.

Law Reviews.

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).

24-7-115. Opinions as to medical findings.

In the trial of any civil suit, there shall be received in evidence if offered on behalf of any party thereto, opinions as to medical findings as a result of treatment or examination of the party, whether such opinions are based on subjective or objective findings; provided such opinions are those of persons otherwise qualified as medical experts. It is declared to be the intent of this section that medical opinions based on subjective findings are no longer to be excluded from evidence whether the opinion is from the treating expert or an expert called in for purposes of examination and evaluation.

Acts 1967, ch. 262, § 1; T.C.A.; § 24-718, T.C.A., §24-7-114.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-7-115, concerning telephone company records, was transferred to §24-7-116 in 2000.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 154.

Law Reviews.

Physical Condition in the New Tennessee Rules of Evidence (Donald F. Paine), 26 No. 2, Tenn. B.J. 25 (1990).

Policing the Bases of Modern Expert Testimony (Ronald L. Carlson), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 577 (1986).

The Hearsay Rule — Expert Medical Testimony Based upon Out-of-Court Statements by Other Medical Personnel, 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 481.

24-7-116. Telephone company records.

In any judicial proceeding in which a telephone company is subpoenaed to produce records of customer service or billing charges, it shall be sufficient compliance with the subpoena if the custodian or other authorized agent of the company shall, either by personal delivery or by certified or registered mail, file with the court clerk a true and correct copy of all records described in such subpoena. The records shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the custodian stating in substance:

That the affiant is duly authorized custodian of the records and has authority to certify the records;

That the copy is a true copy of all the records described in the subpoena; and

That the records were prepared by the personnel of the company acting under the control of the company, in the ordinary course of business.

If the company has none of the records described, or only part thereof, the custodian shall so state in the affidavit and file the affidavit and such records as are available.

Where the personal attendance of the custodian of telephone company records is required, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause which reads:

“The custodian must personally attend in order to comply with this subpoena.”

Where both the personal attendance of the custodian and the production of the original record are required, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause which reads:

“The custodian must personally attend and produce the original records in order to comply with this subpoena.”

Where the personal attendance of the custodian is required, the reasonable cost of producing the records and attendance of the custodian shall be taxed as costs of court, subject to review by the court after notice and hearing to the involved parties and to the telephone company.

If the records are confidential by state or federal law, the copy of the records shall be separately enclosed in an inner envelope or wrapper, sealed, with the title and number of the action, name of witness and date of subpoena clearly inscribed thereon. The sealed envelope or wrapper shall then be enclosed in an outer envelope or wrapper, sealed, and directed as follows:

If the subpoena directs attendance in court, to the clerk of such court or to the judge thereof;

If the subpoena directs attendance at a deposition, to the officer before whom the deposition is to be taken, at the place designated in the subpoena for the taking of the deposition or at the officer's place of business; and

In other cases, to the officer, body or tribunal conducting the hearing, at a like address.

Unless the sealed envelope or wrapper is returned to a witness who is to appear personally, the copy of the records shall remain sealed and shall be opened only at the time of trial, deposition, or other hearing, upon the direction of the judge, court, officer, body or tribunal conducting the proceeding, in the presence of all parties who have appeared in person or by counsel at such trial, deposition or hearing. Records which are not introduced in evidence or required as part of the records shall be returned to the person or entity from whom received.

The copy of the record shall be admissible in evidence to the same extent as though the original thereof were offered and the custodian had been present and testified to the matters stated in the affidavit.

The affidavit shall be admissible in evidence and the matters stated therein shall be presumed true in the absence of a preponderance of evidence to the contrary.

In view of the property right of a telephone company in its records, original records may be withdrawn after introduction into evidence and copies substituted, unless otherwise directed for good cause by the court, judge, officer, body or tribunal conducting the hearing. The custodian may prepare copies of original records in advance of testifying for the purpose of making substitution of the original record, and the reasonable charges for making such copies shall be taxed as costs of court. If copies are not prepared in advance, they can be made and substituted at any time after introduction of the original record, and the reasonable charges for making such copies shall be taxed as costs of court.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, telephone company records that have been subpoenaed may be delivered by facsimile to local law enforcement officials. The custodian or other authorized agent of the company subsequently, by registered or certified mail, shall file with the court clerk a true and correct copy of all records described in such subpoena.

Acts 1984, ch. 899, §§ 1-5; T.C.A., §24-7-115; Acts 2003, ch. 56, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-7-116, concerning audio-visually recorded testimony in child sexual abuse proceedings, was transferred to §24-7-117 in 2000.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Access to bank and telephone records for commercial purposes, OAG 98-0160, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (8/24/98).

24-7-117. Audiovisually recorded testimony in child sexual abuse proceedings.

This section shall apply to proceedings in the prosecution of offenses defined in § 37-1-602 as “child sexual abuse” and to any civil proceeding in which child sexual abuse as defined in § 37-1-602 is an issue, and it shall apply only to the statements of a child or children under the age of thirteen (13) years of age who are victims of such abuse.

The court may, on the motion of any party, order that the testimony of the child be taken outside the courtroom and be recorded for showing in the courtroom before the court and the finder of fact. Only the court, the attorneys for the parties, the defendant, persons necessary to operate the equipment, and any person whose presence would contribute to the welfare and well-being of the child may be present in the room with the child during the child's testimony. Only the attorneys or the court may question the child. The persons operating the equipment shall be confined to an adjacent room or behind a screen or mirror that permits such persons to see and hear the child during the child's testimony, but does not permit the child to see or hear them. The court shall permit the defendant to observe and hear the testimony of the child in person. The court shall also ensure that:

The recording is both visual and oral and is recorded on film or videotape or by other similar audiovisual means;

The recording equipment was capable of making an accurate recording, the operator was competent, and the recording is accurate and is not altered;

Each voice on the recording is identified; and

The attorney for the defendant is afforded an opportunity to view the recording before it is shown in the courtroom.

The court may, on the motion of either party upon showing of good cause, order that additional testimony of the child be taken, if time and circumstances permit, outside the courtroom and be recorded for showing in the courtroom before the court and the finder of fact in the proceeding in accordance with subsection (b). If time and circumstances do not permit such additional out of court recording, the court may order the child to testify in court. The testimony of the child shall be restricted to the matters specified by the court as the basis for granting such order.

If the court orders the testimony of a child to be taken under subsection (b) or (c), the child shall not be required to testify in court at the proceeding for which the testimony was taken, unless so ordered pursuant to subsection (c).

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 18; 1991, ch. 273, § 29; T.C.A., §24-7-116.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-7-117, concerning admissibility in evidence of DNA analysis, was transferred to §24-7-118 in 2000.

Cross-References. Audio-visual recordings in child abuse and child sexual abuse proceedings, §§37-1-405,37-1-406.

Use of closed circuit television for testimony of child victim, §24-7-120.

Use of videotapes in child sexual abuse investigations, §§37-1-607,37-1-609.

Law Reviews.

Are Videotapes in Child Sexual Abuse Prosecutions Constitutional? (Donald F. Paine), 25 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 29 (1989).

Evidence — State v. Begley: When the Tennessee Supreme Court Meets PCR-Method DNA Analysis, Its Love at First Sight, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1239 (1998).

The Confrontation Clause Applied to Minor Victims of Sexual Abuse, 42 Vand. L. Rev. 1511 (1989).

The New McDaniel Test for Expert Opinions (Donald F. Paine), 34 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 23 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. Videotaped statements, OAG 85-196, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (6/17/85).